New York, session 2025-2026, A9083.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The public authorities law is amended by adding a new 2 section 1279-m to read as follows: 3 § 1279-m. Monthly fare cap. The authority shall establish and imple- 4 ment a thirty-day fare cap program through One Metro New York which sets 5 the amount of fares a rider shall be charged during a thirty-day period. 6 A rider upon reaching the number of fares paid, shall have an unlimited 7 pass for the remainder of such thirty-day period. Upon completion of 8 such thirty-day period, the number of fares needing to be paid shall be 9 reset. For the purposes of this section, "One Metro New York" shall 10 mean the digital fare payment system being implemented by the authority 11 at subway and bus stations within the metropolitan commuter transporta- 12 tion district and the state of New Jersey. 13 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13699-01-5